Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Mississippi Coroner Reorganization Act

§ 19-21-101.
Short title.

Sections 19-21-101 through 19-21-109 shall be known and cited as the “Mississippi Coroner Reorganization Act of 1986.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 19-21-103.
Qualifications of candidate for office.

Beginning with the 1987 general election and thereafter, each candidate for the elected office of coroner shall, as a minimum, possess a high school graduation diploma or its equivalent, be twenty-one (21) years of age or older, and be a qualified elector of the county in which elected.

The minimum education requirements of subsection (1) of this section and subsection (1) of Section 41-61-57 shall not apply to any coroner holding office on July 1, 1986, who is reelected in the 1987 general election and thereafter, as long as such coroner maintains continuous active service as county medical examiner or county medical examiner investigator. However, all other portions of subsection (1) of Section 41-61-57 shall apply to such coroners.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 19-21-105.
Elected coroner required to attend Mississippi Forensics Laboratory and State Medical Examiner Death Investigation Training School; oath of office.

Each coroner elected in the 1987 general election and thereafter shall attend the Mississippi Forensics Laboratory and State Medical Examiner Death Investigation Training School provided for in subsection (5) of Section 41-61-57, and shall successfully complete subsequent testing on the subject material prior to taking the oath of office. If the elected coroner fails to successfully complete the school and testing, he shall not be eligible to take the oath of office.

Upon successful completion of the death investigation training school, the coroner shall take the oath of office, and he then shall be designated the chief county medical examiner or chief county medical examiner investigator, as provided in subsection (2) of Section 41-61-57, and shall perform the duties of such office as required by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 3; Laws, 2015, ch. 452, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2015.

§ 19-21-107.
Appointment of successor to serve in office of coroner.

In the absence of an individual to serve in the office of coroner, there shall immediately be appointed a successor in the manner provided by law.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 19-21-109.
Transfer of duties from county ranger to sheriff of county.

The duties of the county ranger, heretofore exercised by the coroner, shall be transferred to the sheriff of the county, who shall have all the duties and powers of the ranger’s office.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1986.